Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 88.15, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Violation not a payable offense. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 609.101, subdivision 4, the Judicial Council may not place a violation of subdivision 2 on the uniform fine schedule. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end